Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.100

Motion pictures.

Motion pictures unrated after November 1968 or rated R, X, or NC-17 by the motion picture association of America shall not be shown in juvenile detention facilities or facilities operated by the department of children, youth, and families.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 629; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 807.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.